Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-802
Clothing; household goods; storage; sale; notice.

All garments, clothing, wearing apparel, or household goods placed in storage or on which any of the services or labors mentioned in section 52-801 have been performed and then placed in storage by agreement and remaining in the possession of a person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation without the reasonable or agreed charges having been paid for a period of twelve months may be sold to pay the charges. The person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to whom the charges are payable shall first notify the owner or owners thereof of the time and place of such sale. Persons, firms, partnerships, limited liability company, or corporations operating as warehouses or warehousemen shall not be affected by this section.

Laws 1943, c. 120, § 2, p. 416;

R.S.1943, § 52-802;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 310.